Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-2227
Department; submit budget.

Based upon the department-approved plan and budget for each designated area agency on aging, the department shall submit a budget request to the Department of Administrative Services, on or before the date provided in subsection (1) of section 81-132 for each even-numbered year, for the funds required to achieve the objectives of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act. Such request shall include all federal funds available to the department for reimbursement to area agencies on aging.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 27;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 28;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 12, § 4;

Laws 2016, LB1092, § 6.